California, session 20252026, AB2362.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.Section 39875 of the Education Code is amended to read:39875.(a)Except as provided pursuant to subdivisions (b) to (h), inclusive, this article shall apply to all drivers employed by a local educational agency, contracted by a local educational agency, or contracted by any entity with funding from a local educational agency, providing school-related pupil transportation for compensation.(b)Nothing in this article shall be construed to apply to a driver employed by any of the following:(1)A municipally owned transit system offering supplementary service.(2)A congregate care facility licensed by the State Department of Social Services.(3)A county human services agency.(4)An entity, excluding entities with a primary purpose of providing transportation services, serving pupils experiencing homelessness that is coordinated with the homeless continuum of care in counties that have one or otherwise designated to serve children who are homeless by a county without a continuum of care.(5)A county probation agency.(6)Another government agency, other than a local educational agency.(7)A foster family agency, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.(8)A tribal authority.(c)This article shall not apply to any of the following persons who are compensated to drive a pupil:(1)A parent or relative as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 361.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or a nonrelative extended family member as defined in Section 362.7 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(2)A guardian.(3)A caregiver given temporary or permanent custody of the pupil by a court, child welfare agency, tribal authority, or county probation department.(4)A court-appointed educational rights holder.(5)A court-appointed special advocate.(6)A pupil who drives themselves.(d)If both of the following occur, this article shall not apply to a school employee of a local educational agency when the employee provides transportation to pupils due to or because of the employee’s supervision of pupils for a field trip, extracurricular activity, or athletic program.(1)A local educational agency makes a reasonable effort to secure a driver who meets the requirements of this article.(2)When a local educational agency is unable to secure a driver who meets the requirements of this article, the local educational agency informs the parent, guardian, or court-appointed educational rights holder of the pupil being transported that the driver transporting their pupil does not meet the requirements of this article, unless that notice will jeopardize a pupil’s privacy rights.(e)(1)This article shall not apply to a school employee of a local educational agency when the employee provides transportation to pupils due to or because of the employee’s supervision of pupils for other activities, not to exceed 40 hours of drive time per school year per employee.(2)For a local educational agency with fewer than 2,500 units of average daily attendance and a frontier school district, as defined in Section 94, this article shall not apply to a school employee of a local educational agency when the employee provides transportation to pupils due to or because of the employee’s supervision of pupils for other activities, not to exceed 200 hours of drive time per school year per employee, or such other amount as approved by the governing board.(f)This article shall not apply to a driver who transports a pupil who must be immediately transported to a facility in the case of a medical or psychiatric emergency, or in the case of pupils who need to be transported immediately as the result of an emergency that arises as a result of a fire, flood, earthquake, or epidemic, or because of any order of any military officer of the United States or of the state to meet an emergency created by war, or because of an immediate threat to the physical safety of the pupil or pupils. The exemption pursuant to this subdivision involving an epidemic shall only apply to each epidemic for a period lasting no longer than one month.(g)This article shall not apply to a driver who transports a pupil if the transportation is being provided through a Foster Youth Services Coordinating Program while a pupil’s transportation plan is being finalized. The exemption pursuant to this subdivision shall apply for a period lasting no longer than one month after the first ride is provided to that pupil under this exemption.(h)This article shall not apply to a driver during a trip for which they are authorized by the local educational agency to transport one or more pupils for a field trip when the destination is more than 200 miles from the transported pupil’s California school campus.SEC. 2.Section 39875.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:39875.5.(a)A local educational agency with fewer than 2,500 units of average daily attendance or a frontier school district, as defined in Section 94, may issue a rural activity driver authorization to an employee or registered volunteer who transports pupils in a vehicle with a maximum capacity of 10 or fewer persons, including the driver, to or from curricular or extracurricular events, not including home-to-school transportation, if the employee or registered volunteer meets all of the following conditions:(1)Holds a valid California driver’s license for the appropriate class of vehicle.(2)Is at least 21 years of age.(3)Has a satisfactory driving record that includes none of the following:(A)Within three years, has committed any violation that results in a conviction assigned a violation point count of two or more, as defined in Sections 12810 and 12810.5 of the Vehicle Code.(B)Within three years, has had their driving privilege suspended, revoked, or on probation for any reason involving the unsafe operation of a motor vehicle.(C)Has been determined by the Department of Motor Vehicles to be a negligent or incompetent operator.(4)Has a valid criminal records summary as described in Section 44237.(5)Participates in the Department of Motor Vehicles’ pull-notice system.(6)Submits and clears a tuberculosis risk assessment consistent with Section 49406.(7)Has completed training at least equivalent to the American Red Cross first aid training program, or holds a valid and current first aid certificate issued by the American Red Cross or by an organization whose first aid training program is at least equivalent to the American Red Cross’ first aid training program, as determined by the Emergency Medical Services Authority.(8)Completes at least four hours of training including instruction in all of the following:(A)Defensive driving.(B)Pupil supervision.(C)Providing proper accommodations for pupils with disabilities.(D)Handling accidents, incidents, and emergency situations.(E)Operations in inclement weather.(b)An employee or registered volunteer shall not transport pupils in any of the following conditions:(1)The route exceeds 200 road miles one way.(2)The employee or registered volunteer has driven any vehicle for 10 or more hours in the preceding 24-hour period.(3)(A)The employee or registered volunteer is contracted as a commercial driver.(B)Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), an employee may receive their ordinary wages and an employee or registered volunteer may receive a modest stipend for driving pursuant to the authorization provided by this section.(c)(1)A vehicle driven by an employee or registered volunteer pursuant to the authorization provided by this section shall undergo an annual safety inspection at a facility licensed by the Bureau of Automotive Repair.(2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), if the nearest facility licensed by the Bureau of Automotive Repair is greater than 90 miles away, the inspection may be performed by a district or county mechanic who holds an Automotive Service Excellence certification.(d)A local educational agency that issues a rural activity driver authorization to an employee or registered volunteer shall maintain records of all authorizations, inspections, and training required pursuant to this section for review by the department.SECTION 1. Section 39875 of the Education Code is amended to read:39875. (a) Except as provided pursuant to subdivisions (b) to (g), inclusive, this article shall apply to all drivers employed by a local educational agency, contracted by a local educational agency, or contracted by any entity with funding from a local educational agency, providing school-related pupil transportation for compensation.(b) Nothing in this article shall be construed to apply to a driver employed by any of the following:(1) A municipally owned transit system offering supplementary service.(2) A congregate care facility licensed by the State Department of Social Services.(3) A county human services agency.(4) An entity, excluding entities with a primary purpose of providing transportation services, serving pupils experiencing homelessness that is coordinated with the homeless continuum of care in counties that have one or otherwise designated to serve children who are homeless by a county without a continuum of care.(5) A county probation agency.(6) Another government agency, other than a local educational agency.(7) A foster family agency, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.(8) A tribal authority.(c) Nothing in this This article shall be construed to not apply to any of the following persons who are compensated to drive a pupil:(1) A parent or relative as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 361.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or a nonrelative extended family member as defined in Section 362.7 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(2) A guardian.(3) A caregiver given temporary or permanent custody of the pupil by a court, child welfare agency, tribal authority, or county probation department.(4) A court-appointed educational rights holder.(5) A court-appointed special advocate.(6) A pupil who drives themself. themselves.(d) If both of the following occur, nothing in this (1) This article shall be construed to not apply to a school employee of a local educational agency when the employee provides transportation to pupils due to or because of the employee’s supervision of pupils for a field trip, extracurricular activity, or athletic program, or when the employee provides transportation to pupils for other activities, not to exceed 40 hours of drive time per school year per employee: employee, except as provided in paragraph (2), if both of the following conditions are met:(1)A(A) The local educational agency makes a reasonable effort to secure a driver who meets the requirements of this article.(2)When a(B) If the local educational agency is unable to secure a driver who meets the requirements of this article, the local educational agency informs the parent, guardian, or court-appointed educational rights holder of the pupil being transported that the driver transporting their pupil does not meet the requirements of this article, unless that notice will jeopardize a pupil’s privacy rights.(2) For a local educational agency with fewer than 2,500 units of average daily attendance and a frontier school district, as defined in Section 94, the drive time limit specified in paragraph (1) shall be 200 hours per school year per employee instead of 40 hours.(e) Nothing in this This article shall be construed to not apply to a driver who transports a pupil who must be immediately transported to a facility in the case of a medical or psychiatric emergency, or in the case of pupils who need to be transported immediately as the result of an emergency that arises as a result of a fire, flood, earthquake, or epidemic, or because of any order of any military officer of the United States or of the state to meet an emergency created by war, or because of an immediate threat to the physical safety of the pupil or pupils. The exemption pursuant to this subdivision involving an epidemic shall only apply to each epidemic for a period lasting no longer than one month.(f) Nothing in this This article shall be construed to not apply to a driver who transports a pupil if the transportation is being provided through a Foster Youth Services Coordinating Program while a pupil’s transportation plan is being finalized. The exemption pursuant to this subdivision shall apply for a period lasting no longer than one month after the first ride is provided to that pupil under this exemption.(g) Nothing in this This article shall be construed to not apply to a driver during a trip for which they are authorized by the local educational agency to transport one or more pupils for a field trip when the destination is more than 200 miles from the transported pupil’s California school campus.SEC. 3.SEC. 2. Section 39881.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:39881.5. The Legislature hereby establishes the Rural Transportation Safety Grant Program to provide funding to small and rural local educational agencies for costs associated with training, inspections, and compliance under this article. Subject to appropriation by the Legislature, the superintendent shall administer the program.